Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2917
Tolling of civil statute of limitations; when.

During the period of the restorative justice or dispute resolution process, any applicable civil statute of limitations shall be tolled as to the parties. The tolling shall commence on the date the approved center accepts the case and shall end on the date of the last restorative justice or mediation session. This period shall be no longer than sixty days without consent of all the parties.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 17;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 18.